New York, session 2025-2026, A1393.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision (c) of section 1174 of the vehicle and traffic 2 law, as amended by chapter 433 of the laws of 2024, is amended to read 3 as follows: 4 (c) Every person convicted of a violation of subdivision (a) of this 5 section shall: for a first conviction thereof, be punished by a fine of 6 not less than two hundred fifty dollars nor more than four hundred 7 dollars or by imprisonment for not more than thirty days or by both such 8 fine and imprisonment; for a conviction of a second violation, both of 9 which were committed within a period of three years, such person shall 10 be punished by a fine of not less than six hundred dollars nor more than 11 seven hundred fifty dollars or by imprisonment for not more than one 12 hundred eighty days or by both such fine and imprisonment; upon a 13 conviction of a third or subsequent violation, all of which were commit- 14 ted within a period of three years, such person shall be punished by a 15 fine of not less than seven hundred fifty dollars nor more than one 16 thousand five hundred dollars or by imprisonment for not more than one 17 hundred eighty days or by both such fine and imprisonment. Every person 18 convicted of a second violation or subsequent violation thereafter shall 19 be required to attend a driver education course, if recommended by the 20 court. 21 § 2. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 22 have become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amendment and/or 23 repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implementation of 24 this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and completed 25 on or before such effective date. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03835-01-5